Hawaii statutes.
§412:12-105 Authority of out-of-state banks
to establish a de novo interstate branch or acquire an interstate branch.
(a) An out-of-state bank that does not operate a branch in this State and that
meets the requirements of this article may establish and operate a branch in
this State.

(b) An out-of-state bank that does not operate
a branch in this State and that meets the requirements of this article may
establish and operate a branch in this State through the acquisition of a
branch.

(c) An out-of-state bank desiring to establish
and operate a branch or to acquire and operate a branch in this State pursuant
to this section shall provide to the commissioner written notice of the
proposed transaction not later than the date on which the bank applies to the
responsible federal bank supervisory agency for approval to establish or
acquire the branch. The filing of the notice shall be accompanied by a filing
fee of $9,000 or a greater amount as the commissioner may establish by rule
pursuant to chapter 91. The filing fee shall be nonrefundable.

(d) No branch of an out-of-state bank may be
established or acquired in this State under this section, unless:

(1) The out-of-state bank confirms in writing to the
commissioner that as long as it maintains a branch in this State, it shall
comply with all applicable laws of this State;

(2) The applicant provides to the commissioner
satisfactory evidence of compliance with the applicable requirements of chapter
414 relating to foreign corporations; and

(3) The commissioner, acting within thirty days after
receiving notice of an application under subsection (c), certifies to the
responsible federal bank supervisory agency that the requirements of this
article have been met. [L 1996, c 155, pt of §1; am L 1999, c 283, §2; am L
2002, c 40, §35]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next